Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 8. Wyoming Community Facilities Program

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 233, § 3, directs the Wyoming business council to report to the joint appropriations and joint minerals, business and economic development interim committees not later than December 1, 2005, with respect to all grants and loans awarded and cooperative agreements entered under the provisions of the Wyoming community facilities program established under §

9-12-801

, which report is to include the name of the recipient of each loan or grant, the amount of each loan or grant and the project funded. Section 3 further directs the council to survey opportunities to include in the Wyoming community facilities program other community enhancements, recognizing individual community needs, and to provide a report of the survey to the joint appropriations and joint minerals, business and economic development interim committees not later than September 1, 2005, for consideration of possible legislation to address those needs.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 233, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

§ 9-12-801.
Wyoming community facilities program; purpose; creation; administration by council; rulemaking authority; eligible projects.

It is the purpose of this article to assist communities to preserve former school and government facilities that have existing or future community uses.

The council shall administer a Wyoming community facilities program as provided by this article, subject to the approval of grants and loans by the state loan and investment board as provided by this article.

Any qualifying community with a demonstrated need for a community facility, including a city, town, county, joint powers board, other local governmental entity or the Eastern Shoshone or Northern Arapaho tribe, or the cooperative tribal governing body, may submit an application to the council for a grant or loan under this program on forms prescribed by and subject to rules promulgated by the council. Application by a joint powers board shall require the approval of all participating agencies to the joint powers agreement.

Grants or loans may be recommended by the council and awarded by the state loan and investment board for economic development community facilities projects which provide:

Space for community gatherings and functions;

Appropriate recreational, swimming and athletic facilities for community members, particularly youth;

Other functions or uses determined by the council to be consistent with the purposes of this article.

In adopting rules and recommending grants and loans under this article, the council shall require all projects to be related to economic development or enhancement of quality of life in a community. Projects may consist of:

The expansion, renovation or remodeling of existing surplus government facilities;

The purchase of an interest in the expansion, renovation or conversion of school facilities to the extent the facilities exceed statewide school building and facility adequacy standards established by the school facilities commission under W.S.

21-15-115

. No ownership interest to the project or facility under a project shall remain with the school district upon expenditure of any funds under this program for any project.

All grants or loans recommended by the council shall be referred by the council to the state loan and investment board for final approval or disapproval in accordance with this article.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 233, § 1; 2022 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence of (c), deleted “or” following “joint powers board,” added “or the Eastern Shoshone or Northern Arapaho tribe, or the cooperative tribal governing body,” made a related change; deleted “or cooperative agreements for” following “interest in” in the first sentence of (e)(ii); in (f), added “or” following grants” and deleted “or cooperative agreements” following “loans” and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

The governor vetoed language in paragraph (e)(ii) pertaining to the right to exercise control remaining with the school district.

§ 9-12-802.
Community facility qualifications; demonstration of need.

To qualify for a grant or loan under this article, an applicant shall demonstrate:

A commitment by the applicant community to adequately maintain the project facility for which the grant or loan is requested during a reasonable period of time;

A partnership or other working arrangement or agreement with other local governmental entities to ensure the viability of the project facility over a reasonable period of time;

The project facility is not otherwise provided in the community or that such a facility exists except that the financing of that facility has not been paid in full;

The project will not compete with existing governmental organizations or businesses;

The relationship of the project facility to a community economic development plan or to the enhancement of quality of life in the community;

That all project costs will be funded at the time of receipt of a grant or loan under this article, with funding sources specified within the project application;

The availability of funds sufficient to maintain the project facility. The project application shall clearly identify maintenance funding sources sufficient to cover maintenance costs for a period of not less than four (4) years;

Any other criteria developed by the council consistent with the purposes of this article.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 233, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-12-803.
Community facility grant and loan; approval by state loan and investment board.

Grants shall be awarded on a matching basis at match proportions recommended by the council and approved by the board.

Grants or loans may be used to fund project costs in accordance with approved applications and rules and regulations established by the council. Grant or loan funds may be used to contract with community development organizations and state development organizations in accordance with this article and approved project applications. For purposes of this subsection, “community development organizations” shall be as defined under W.S. 9-12-301(a)(ii) and “state development organizations” shall be as defined under W.S. 9-12-301(a)(iv).

Loans provided under this article shall be adequately collateralized as determined by the council. No loans shall be made without the written opinion of the attorney general certifying the legality of the transaction and all documents connected therewith. An election approving the project and borrowing for the project by the qualified electors of the borrowing entity shall be required only if the attorney general determines such an election is otherwise required by law.

Repayments of loans under this article shall be credited to the community facilities program account.

The council shall prioritize proposed grants and loans it recommends to the state loan and investment board in accordance with rules it adopts under this article.

The state loan and investment board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement its duties under this article governing the approval or disapproval of projects recommended by the council.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 233, § 1; 2022 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “cooperative agreements,” following “proposed” in (e).

§ 9-12-804.
Wyoming community facilities program account.

The community facilities program account is created within the special revenue fund and shall consist of funds credited to the account as provided by law. Funds in the account are continuously appropriated to the council to be used only for grants or loans authorized by the state loan and investment board under this article.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 233, § 1; 2022 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “cooperative agreements,” following “only for” in the seconded sentence.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 233, § 3, appropriates $7,500,000 from the general fund to the Wyoming community facilities program account established under §

9-12-804

and additionally appropriates $252,350 from the general fund to the Wyoming business council for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, for personnel, information, marketing, research, consulting and other costs associated with implementing the act.

§ 9-12-805.
Tribal participation in community facilities program. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 28, § 1; repealed by 2022 ch. 1, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.